Arkansas, session 2025, SB380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-10-118 is repealed.
25-10-118. Child support enforcement program — Reports.
The Office of Child Support Enforcement of the Revenue Division of the
Department of Finance and Administration shall file a semiannual report with
the Legislative Council concerning performance and progress made in
administering the Child Support Enforcement Program approved under Title IV-D
of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.






*JLL177*
03/05/2025 9:58:17 AM JLL177